Georgia, session 2025_26, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 11 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
public school property and facilities, is amended by adding a new part to read as follows:
S. B. 148
- 1 -

LC 49 2315S (SCS)
"Part 4
20-2-590.
(a) The Department of Education is authorized to establish a pilot program, beginning in
the 2025-2026 school year, to provide for the development and study of outdoor learning
spaces on elementary and secondary school property. The purpose of the pilot program
shall be to determine whether and how to implement best practices and design standards
for outdoor learning spaces.
(b) The Department of Education is authorized to select elementary or secondary schools
with sufficient existing or potential outdoor learning spaces for participation in the pilot
program as pilot schools. Private, nonprofit, and local school system funding may be
utilized by such pilot schools for community engagement, school grounds design support,
and capital construction costs. The local board of education for each pilot school shall
agree to implement a program to incorporate outdoor learning spaces into the existing
curriculum and to continue to provide such program for a period no shorter than three
years.
(c) The Department of Education shall provide for an evaluation regarding the success and
impact of the pilot program upon completion of the third year of the pilot program and
shall report the results of such evaluation to the House Committee on Education and the
Senate Education and Youth Committee."
SECTION 2.
Part 4 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to sick, personal, and maternity leave for teachers and other school personnel, is
amended by revising Code Section 20-2-851, relating to use of accumulated sick leave for
personal or professional reasons, as follows:
S. B. 148
- 2 -

LC 49 2315S (SCS)
"20-2-851.
During any school year, personnel may utilize up to a maximum of three five days of any
accumulated sick leave for the purpose of absenting themselves from their duties for
personal or professional reasons if prior approval of their absence is given by the local
school superintendent or his or her authorized representative; provided, however, that the
absence is not in conflict with a local board of education policy concerning school days on
which the presence of the personnel requesting absence is essential for effective school
operation. No grant of approval for an absence permitted under this Code section shall be
conditioned upon disclosure of the specific purpose for which such absence is sought, nor
shall any such grant of approval be withheld or denied because of the failure or refusal of
personnel to disclose the specific purpose for which such an absence is sought; provided,
however, that personnel may be requested to state whether the absence is sought under the
category of 'personal' or 'professional' absence."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 148
- 3 -